District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1811

Issuance of certificate as condition precedent.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-99, § 12, 27 DCR 3599
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 22, 39 DCR 9195

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-311.

Editor's Notes

Severability: Section 21 of D.C. Law 9-197 provided that if any provision of the act is held invalid for any reason, the invalidity shall not effect the other provisions which shall be given effect without the invalid provisions.